Florida, session 2026, SB376.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 14 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 15 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 16 public records.â 17 (4)âAGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.â 18 (d)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 19 a.ââHome addressesâ means the dwelling location at which an 20 individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing 21 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot 22 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood 23 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive 24 property information that may reveal the home address. 25 b.ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned to 26 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320. 27 c.ââTelephone numbersâ includes home telephone numbers, 28 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone 29 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal 30 communications devices. 31 2.a.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 32 and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement 33 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by 34 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and 35 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of 36 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of 37 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal 38 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties 39 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and 40 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 41 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 42 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home 43 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 44 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 45 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 46 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 47 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 48 Constitution. 49 b.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 50 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 51 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties 52 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workersâ compensation 53 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal 54 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the 55 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 56 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 57 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 58 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 59 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 60 Constitution. 61 c.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 62 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 63 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulationâs Bureau of 64 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation 65 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state 66 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses, 67 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 68 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 69 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 70 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 71 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 72 d.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 73 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in 74 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone 75 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment 76 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names 77 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 78 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 79 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 80 e.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 81 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court, 82 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and 83 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names, 84 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 85 employment of the spouses and children of current or former 86 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the 87 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 88 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of 89 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 90 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 91 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 92 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 93 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 94 by the Legislature. 95 f.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 96 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant 97 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 98 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 99 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 100 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys, 101 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant 102 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools 103 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 104 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 105 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from 106 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 107 g.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 108 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 109 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 110 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 111 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 112 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and 113 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 114 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 115 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 116 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day 117 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates, 118 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims, 119 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative 120 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are 121 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 122 Constitution. 123 h.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 124 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor 125 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors, 126 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency 127 or water management district whose duties include hiring and 128 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or 129 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses, 130 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 131 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 132 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 133 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 134 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 135 i.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 136 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers; 137 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 138 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such 139 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 140 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 141 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 142 Constitution. 143 j.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 144 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 145 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home 146 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 147 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the 148 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 149 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 150 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 151 k.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 152 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation 153 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention 154 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile 155 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention 156 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers, 157 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II, 158 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor 159 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior 160 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation 161 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of 162 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 163 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children 164 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and 165 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel 166 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 167 Constitution. 168 l.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 169 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant 170 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 171 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the 172 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 173 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 174 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal 175 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal 176 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations 177 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 178 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders, 179 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant 180 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s. 181 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 182 m.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 183 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors 184 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the 185 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 186 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current 187 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and 188 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 189 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors 190 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 191 Constitution. 192 n.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 193 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses, 194 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 195 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names 196 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 197 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 198 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 199 o.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 200 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department 201 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination 202 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability 203 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed 204 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health 205 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the 206 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone 207 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 208 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of 209 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such 210 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 211 the State Constitution. 212 p.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 213 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner 214 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former 215 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties 216 result in a determination of a personâs skill and safety to 217 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses, 218 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 219 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees; 220 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 221 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are 222 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 223 Constitution. 224 q.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 225 and photographs of current or former emergency medical 226 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the 227 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 228 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 229 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and 230 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 231 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are 232 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 233 Constitution. 234 r.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 235 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an 236 agencyâs office of inspector general or internal audit 237 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste, 238 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that 239 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline; 240 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 241 and places of employment of spouses and children of such 242 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 243 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 244 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 245 Constitution. 246 s.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 247 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 248 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction 249 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers, 250 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 251 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 252 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 253 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 254 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this 255 sub-subparagraph, the term âaddiction treatment facilityâ means 256 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed 257 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention, 258 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed 259 service component described in s. 397.311(27). 260 t.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 261 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 262 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center 263 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the 264 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a 265 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties 266 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual 267 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation 268 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case 269 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 270 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 271 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the 272 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 273 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s. 274 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 275 u.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 276 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 277 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s. 278 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the 279 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names, 280 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates 281 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such 282 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 283 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 284 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 285 Constitution. 286 v.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 287 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators 288 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 289 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 290 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 291 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations 292 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 293 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s. 294 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 295 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 296 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 297 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 298 reenactment by the Legislature. 299 w.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 300 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county 301 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant 302 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home 303 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 304 places of employment of the spouses and children of current 305 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county 306 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy 307 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day 308 care facilities attended by the children of current county 309 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys, 310 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city 311 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 312 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a 313 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county 314 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city 315 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public 316 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 317 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 318 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 319 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 320 x.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 321 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the 322 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses, 323 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of 324 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former 325 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day 326 care facilities attended by the children of such current or 327 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 328 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is 329 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 330 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, 331 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 332 Legislature. 333 y.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 334 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 335 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 336 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates 337 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 338 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the 339 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the 340 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 341 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 342 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 343 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 344 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 345 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 346 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 347 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 348 z.(I)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term: 349 (A)ââCongressional memberâ means a person who is elected to 350 serve as a member of the United States House of Representatives 351 or is elected or appointed to serve as a member of the United 352 States Senate. 353 (B)ââPartial home addressâ means the dwelling location at 354 which an individual resides and includes the physical address, 355 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 356 plot identification number, legal property description, 357 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other 358 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial 359 home address, except for the city and zip code. 360 (C)ââPublic officerâ means a person who holds one of the 361 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief 362 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner, 363 state representative, state senator, property appraiser, 364 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board 365 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner. 366 (II)âThe following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1) 367 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 368 (A)âThe partial home addresses of a current congressional 369 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 370 (B)âThe telephone numbers of a current congressional member 371 or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 372 (C)âThe name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date 373 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or 374 public officer and the name and location of the school or day 375 care facility attended by the minor child. 376 (III)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 377 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 378 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and 379 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 380 aa.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 381 and photographs of sexual assault counselors, as defined in s. 382 90.5035(1), are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 383 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 384 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 385 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 386 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 387 3.a.âAn agency that is the custodian of the information 388 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the 389 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in 390 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that 391 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other 392 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a 393 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption 394 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the 395 statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request and 396 confirm the individualâs status as a party eligible for exempt 397 status. 398 b.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 399 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer of the 400 congressional member, public officer, or other person specified 401 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt status of that 402 information only if an individual requests the maintenance of an 403 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on the basis of 404 eligibility as a current congressional member or public officer 405 and his or her spouse or child submits, as part of the written 406 and notarized request required by sub-subparagraph a., the date 407 of the congressional memberâs or public officerâs election or 408 appointment to public office, the date on which that office is 409 next subject to election, and, if applicable, the date on which 410 the current congressional memberâs or public officerâs minor 411 child reaches the age of majority. The custodian must maintain 412 an exemption granted pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. until the 413 qualifying conditions for the exemption no longer apply to the 414 person subject to the exemption. 415 4.a.âA county property appraiser, as defined in s. 416 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s. 417 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for 418 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must 419 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status 420 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page 421 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all 422 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser 423 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before 424 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax 425 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1, 426 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may 427 not remove the street address, legal description, or other 428 information identifying real property within the agencyâs 429 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise 430 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is 431 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the 432 public records of the agency. 433 b.âAny information restricted from public display, 434 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be 435 provided to the individual whose information was removed. 436 5.âAn officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other 437 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request 438 for the release of his or her exempt information to the 439 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must 440 specify the information to be released and the party authorized 441 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request, 442 the custodial agency must release the specified information to 443 the party authorized to receive such information. 444 6.âThe exemptions in this paragraph apply to information 445 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 446 exemption. 447 7.âInformation made exempt under this paragraph may be 448 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized 449 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s. 450 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as 451 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney 452 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing 453 with The Florida Bar. 454 8.âThe exempt status of a home address contained in the 455 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a 456 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon 457 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such 458 real property no longer constitutes a protected partyâs home 459 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party 460 must submit a written request to release the removed information 461 to the county recorder. The written request to release the 462 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a 463 protected partyâs request for release is pursuant to a 464 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the 465 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerkâs 466 file number for each document containing the information to be 467 released. 468 9.âUpon the death of a protected party as verified by a 469 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party 470 can request the county recorder to release a protected 471 decedentâs removed information unless there is a related request 472 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the 473 decedentâs information or unless such removal is otherwise 474 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to 475 release the removed information upon the death of a protected 476 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or 477 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for 478 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must 479 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument 480 number, or clerkâs file number for each document containing the 481 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the 482 release of any document pursuant to such request. 483 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 484 necessity that the home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of 485 birth, and photographs of sexual assault counselors, as defined 486 in s. 90.5035(1), Florida Statutes, be made exempt from s. 487 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 488 State Constitution. Sexual assault counselors regularly support 489 individuals who are victims of crime by offering emotional 490 assistance, providing resources, and helping the victims 491 navigate the legal process. Sexual assault counselors often work 492 closely with law enforcement agencies, government organizations, 493 and other entities to ensure that the victimsâ rights are upheld 494 and the victimsâ needs are addressed. The personal identifying 495 and location information of sexual assault counselors is 496 frequently documented in police reports or other official 497 records that are provided to a defendant and his or her legal 498 counsel as part of the discovery process. Those documents are 499 subject to public records requests, making the sexual assault 500 counselorsâ personal identifying and location information 501 readily available. The release of this information has led to 502 sexual assault counselors becoming targets of harassment, 503 threats, and retaliation from individuals connected to the cases 504 on which the sexual assault counselors work. The Legislature 505 finds that the release of such personal identifying and location 506 information could place sexual assault counselors in danger of 507 being stalked or physically or emotionally harmed by a defendant 508 or other individual. Therefore, the Legislature finds that the 509 harm that may result from the release of such personal 510 identifying and location information outweighs any public 511 benefit that may be derived from the disclosure of the 512 information. 513 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.